test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-CLASS_AAY_gt-norm.yaml
     jadahlgwáay+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+SIMPLE+PRESENT: jadahlgwáay'ang'waa'uujang
     jadahlgwáay+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+RESIGNED_OBLIGATION: jadahlgwáay'ang'waaäsaa'uujang
     jadahlgwáay+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PRESENT: jadahlgwáay'ang'waa'us
     jadahlgwáay+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PAST: jadahlgwáay'ang'waa'ujaa
     jadahlgwáay+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PAST+HABITUAL: jadahlgwáay'ang'waa'uujaangaa
     jadahlgwáay+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE: jadahlgwáay'ang'waaäsaa'us
     jadahlgwáay+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+PRESENT: jadahlgwáay'ang'waa'ahlanggang
     jadahlgwáay+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+PAST: jadahlgwáay'ang'waa'ahlanggan
     jadahlgwáay+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+PAST+HABITUAL: jadahlgwáay'ang'waa'ahlanggiinii
     jadahlgwáay+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+FUTURE: jadahlgwáay'ang'waaäsaa'ahlans
     jadahlgwáay+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+RELATIVE: jadahlgwáay'ang'waa'ahlans
     jadahlgwáay+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTENSIVE+PAST: jadahlgwáay'ang'aawaa'ahlang
     jadahlgwáay+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+SHOULD_KEEP_ON_VERBING_FOR_A_WHILE: jadahlgwáay'ang'aawaa'ahlanggaa
     jadahlgwáay+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+COUNTERFACTUAL+PRESENT: jadahlgwáay'ang'aawaa'ahlanggang
     jadahlgwáay+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+REFLEXIVE: jadahlgwáay'ang'waa'ahl
     jadahlgwáay+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+FUTURE+REFLEXIVE+INTERROGATIVE: jadahlgwáay'ang'waaäseehl
